Wisconsin, session 2025, AB248.
do enact as follows:AB248,1Section 1. 17.03 (10m) of the statutes is created to read:17.03 (10m) If the office is an appointive state office for a fixed term, the incumbent’s term expires. In this subsection, “appointive state office” means an appointive office of any department, agency, board, office, commission, authority, or other body in state government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, but not including the legislature and the courts.AB248,2Section 2. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to state officers appointed on January 1, 2027. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab248 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab248 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB248 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB248 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB248: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting